Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-503
Misappropriation; injunction; royalty; affirmative acts.

(1) Actual or threatened misappropriation may be enjoined. Upon application to the court, an injunction shall be terminated when the trade secret has ceased to exist, but the injunction may be continued for an additional reasonable period of time in order to eliminate commercial advantage that otherwise would be derived from the misappropriation.

(2) In exceptional circumstances, an injunction may condition future use upon payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time for which use could have been prohibited. Exceptional circumstances shall include, but are not limited to, a material and prejudicial change of position prior to acquiring knowledge or having reason to know of the misappropriation that renders a prohibitive injunction inequitable.

(3) In appropriate circumstances, affirmative acts to protect a trade secret may be compelled by court order.

Laws 1988, LB 337A, § 3.